Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB785.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1321 of Title 25 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1321. Methods of voter registration.An individual qualified to register to vote under section 1301(a) (relating to qualifications to register) may apply to register as follows:* * *(5) Under section 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration).123456789101112131415161718192021 Section 2. Title 25 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1325.1. Electronic voter registration.(a) Establishment.-- Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall implement and administer an electronic voter registration application on a secure computer system, maintained by the department, that permits a qualified elector to electronically submit an application to register to vote or make changes to an existing voter registration.(b) Compliance.--The application must comply with the requirements under section 1327 (relating to preparation and distribution of applications ). (c) Individuals with disabilities.--The department shall implement methods for individuals with disabilities, including individuals who are blind or visually impaired, to submit information through the computer system established under subsection (a).(d) Submittal.--(1) A qualified elector who applies to register to vote under this section shall do all of the following:(i) Enter the data required on the application.(ii) Provide one of the following:(A) The last four digits of the qualified elector's Social Security number.(B) The qualified elector's driver's license number or identification card number issued by the Department of Transportation under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1510(b) (relating to issuance and content of driver's license).(C) If the qualified elector does not have the 20250HB0785PN0806 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information required by clause (A) or (B), any other information required by the department to verify the identity of the qualified elector.(iii) Affirmatively attest to the truth of the information provided by the qualified elector.(2) (i) The department shall obtain an electronic copy of the qualified elector's signature from the qualified elector's driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Transportation under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1510(b).(ii) The department may develop other means of obtaining an electronic signature from a qualified elector, including obtaining a copy of a signature on file with another Commonwealth agency, if the signature is capable of being transmitted to the department in a secure fashion. (3) Notwithstanding the department's ability to obtain an electronic copy of a qualified elector's signature under paragraph (2), the department shall transfer the application to the SURE system for examination and processing by the appropriate commission in accordance with section 1328 (relating to approval of registration applications). If the department is not able to obtain an electronic copy of the qualified elector 's signature, the department shall include a notation that the qualified elector must provide a signature at the polling place or, if the qualified elector votes by absentee ballot, on the absentee ballot application the first time the qualified elector votes after submitting an application.(4) (i) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to 20250HB0785PN0806 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prevent a qualified elector from printing a completed application, signing the application and mailing the application or delivering the application in person to the appropriate commission in accordance with the voter registration application deadlines specified in subsection (g ). (ii) If a qualified elector satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (i), an additional signature shall not be required.(5) Use of an application by a qualified elector shall constitute the qualified elector's consent to the use of the qualified elector's signature on file with the Department of Transportation or any other Commonwealth agency or otherwise provided to the department under paragraph (2) for voter registration purposes.(e) Duties of department.--(1) Within 24 months following the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. Prior to promulgation, the department shall transmit notice of the implementation guidelines to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) The department shall develop and employ security measures to ensure the security and integrity of voter registration applications or changes to voter registrations submitted electronically under this section . (f) Changes to registration . -- (1) If an application is submitted within 15 days before an election:20250HB0785PN0806 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) the application shall be transferred through the SURE system to the appropriate commission; and(ii) the appropriate commission shall ensure that the registrant is not included in the book of qualified electors until the election at which that voter would, but for the date of the registration, be eligible.(2) A registered elector may change information in the registered elector's voter registration records by using the application or a form developed by the department for changes, as determined by the departmen t. (3) The provisions of subsection (d)(1), (2) and (5) shall apply to a submittal for a change to the qualified elector's voter registration records under this subsection.(4) Notwithstanding the department's ability to obtain an electronic copy of a qualified elector's signature u nder subsection (d)(2) for the purpose of a change to an elector's voter registration records, the department shall transfer the application for the change to the SURE system for examination and processing by the appropriate commission in accordance with section 1328. If the department is not able to obtain an electronic copy of the qualified elector's signature, the department shall include a notation that the qualified elector must provide a signature at the polling place or, if the qualified elector votes by absentee ballot, on the absentee ballot application the first time the qualified elector votes after submitting an application for the change.(5) (i) Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prevent a qualified elector from printing a completed application for a change to the qualified elector's voter registration records, signing the application and mailing 20250HB0785PN0806 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the application or delivering the application in person to the appropriate commission in accordance with the voter registration application deadlines specified in subsection (g).(ii) If a qualified elector satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (i), an additional signature shall not be required.(g) Timing.--For electronic voter registration under this section, each commission shall ensure that an applicant who is a qualified elector is registered to vote in an election if the voter transmits the electronic voter registration application through the Internet system maintained by the department no later than 11:59 p.m. on the 15th day prior to the election. (h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Application." The electronic voter registration application developed under subsection (a)."Computer system." The secure computer system developed and maintained by the department in which a qualified elector may electronically submit voter information through the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.Section 3. Sections 1327(a)(3), (4), (5) and (6) and (b)(3) and (4), 1328(a)(2), 1401(a)(5), 1402(b)(2), 1406(a), 1501(b) introductory paragraph and (1), 1503 and 1704(a) of Title 25 are amended to read:§ 1327. Preparation and distribution of applications.(a) Form.--* * *(3) Any person who assists in the completion of the 20250HB0785PN0806 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration application shall sign or, in the case of registration under section 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration), shall electronically sign the application and indicate the person's address. In the case of those registering under sections 1323 (relating to application with driver's license application) and 1325 (relating to government agencies), the person providing assistance shall insert the person's initials or employee or agent identification number on a separate or detachable portion of the application or computer data file.(4) A voter registration application, except an electronic voter registration application under section 1325.1, shall be printed on stock of good quality and shall be of suitable uniform size. [Nothing in this part shall prohibit the design and use of an electronic voter registration application which includes the applicant's digitized or electronic signature.] The registration application, including a registration application under section 1325.1, shall contain the following information; however, the information may be provided on a separate form for voter registration made under section 1323 or 1325:(i) Notice that a registered elector does not need to reregister unless the registered elector has moved.(ii) Instructions on how to fill out and submit the application and notification of when the application must be submitted to a voter registration office or, for electronic voter registration under section 1325.1, electronically, in order to be registered for the ensuing election.(iii) Notice that the applicant must be a citizen of 20250HB0785PN0806 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the United States for at least one month prior to the next election and a resident of this Commonwealth and the election district for at least 30 days and must be at least 18 years of age by the day of the next ensuing election and has not been confined in a penal institution for a conviction of a felony within the last five years. The notice required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).(iv) Notice that political party enrollment is mandatory to vote in a primary election of a political party.(v) Notice that the commission will mail by nonforwardable mail to the applicant a voter's identification card upon acceptance of the application and that the applicant should contact the commission if the identification card is not received within 14 days from the date the application is sent to the registration office[.] or submitted electronically to the department under section 1325.1. In the event that the applicant's electronic registration application did not contain a signature, the registration card shall contain a notice that the registered elector must provide a signature the first time the registered elector votes after submission of the electronic voter registration application.(vi) Notice that registration is not complete until the application is processed and accepted by the commission or, if submitted electronically under section 1325.1, processed and accepted by the department.(vii) A warning to the applicant that making a false registration or furnishing false information is perjury. 20250HB0785PN0806 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The notice required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).(viii) Instructions to Federal or State employees who wish to retain voting residence in county of last residence to so indicate on the application.(ix) Notice that, if an individual declines to register to vote, the fact that the individual has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes. The notice required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration under subsection (b).(x) Notice that, if an individual does register to vote, the office at which the individual submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used for voter registration purposes only. The notices required in this subparagraph shall be in print identical to the declaration in subsection (b).(5) In jurisdictions where there is a single language minority, the [secretary] department may print a bilingual application and develop a bilingual electronic voter registration application.(6) In jurisdictions where a single language minority exceeds 5% of the population, in accordance with applicable law, the [secretary] department shall:(i) print a bilingual application and develop a bilingual electronic voter registration application; and(ii) conduct a public educational program among that language group alerting both organizations and individuals of that group of the availability of the bilingual application and encouraging individuals to 20250HB0785PN0806 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 register.* * *(b) Registration declaration.--* * *(3) The registration declaration shall contain the printed name [and signature of the applicant and the date of signing.], date of signing and, except for an applicant submitting a registration under section 1325.1, the signature of the applicant. An applicant unable to sign the voter registration application shall make a mark before a person of the applicant's choice other than the applicant's employer or an agent of the applicant's union. The person shall insert the person's name, address and telephone number. If the person is an employee or agent of the Department of Transportation or another agency as provided under section 1325 and is assisting the applicant in an official capacity, the employee or agent shall insert the initials and identification number of the employee or agent. In the case of applicants registering under section 1323 or 1325, the person providing assistance shall insert initials or employee or agent identification number on a separate or detachable portion of the application or computer data file.(4) The official registration application shall contain a notice entitled "PENALTY FOR FALSIFYING DECLARATION." The notice shall advise the applicant that if a person signs an official registration application or submits an electronic registration application or a change to registration form under section 1325.1 , knowing a statement declared in the application to be false, the person commits perjury. The notice shall specify the penalty for perjury.20250HB0785PN0806 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *§ 1328. Approval of registration applications.(a) Examination.--Upon receiving a voter registration application, a commissioner, clerk or registrar of a commission shall do all of the following:* * *(2) Examine the application to determine all of the following:(i) Whether the application is complete. The lack of an applicant's signature on an application submitted under section 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration) shall not be grounds for rejecting an otherwise valid application.(ii) Whether the applicant is a qualified elector.(iii) Whether the applicant has an existing registration record. After the commission is connected to the SURE system, the commissioner, clerk or registrar shall search the SURE system on a Statewide basis to determine if the applicant has an existing registration record.(iv) Whether the applicant is entitled or qualified to receive the requested transfer or change, if applicable.* * *§ 1401. General register.(a) General rule.--The general register shall contain all of the following for each registered elector of the county:* * *(5) The digitized or electronic signature of the registered elector. In the case of a qualified elector 20250HB0785PN0806 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permitted to submit a signature the first time that the qualified elector votes after submitting an electronic voter registration application under section 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration), the commission shall enter the qualified elector's signature on the qualified elector's registration record as soon as practicable after the election. The qualified elector shall not be subject to the provisions of section 1210(a.3)(2) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, until the qualified elector's signature has been entered on the qualified elector's registration record. * * *§ 1402. District registers.* * *(b) Computer lists.--* * *(2) After a commission is connected to the SURE system, each commission shall create from its general register a computer list to be used as the district register. For each election district, the list shall contain the names of the registered electors of the election district, alphabetically by last name of each registered elector. Each page of the list shall contain the name of the county, the election district, the date of the election and the date and time the list was prepared. The computer list shall be in a form prescribed by the secretary and must contain necessary information that would otherwise be available in the general register, including, except for a qualified elector permitted to submit a signature at the polling place the first time that the qualified elector votes after submitting an 20250HB0785PN0806 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 electronic voter registration application under section 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration), a legible digitized or electronic signature, the street address and political party of each registered elector, and suitable space for insertion of the signature of the registered elector and for insertion by the proper election official of the number and letter of the stub of the ballot issued to the registered elector or the registered elector's number in the order of admission to the voting systems and the initials of the election official who enters the record of voting in the district register and whether the elector needs assistance to vote and, if so, the nature of the disability. The district register shall be kept at the office of the commission and shall be open to public inspection, subject to reasonable safeguards, rules and regulations.* * *§ 1406. Reports.(a) Commission.--By March 1, a commission shall submit to the secretary an annual report setting forth the number of electors registered under sections 1322 (relating to in-person voter registration), 1323 (relating to application with driver's license application), 1324 (relating to application by mail) [and], 1325 (relating to government agencies) and 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration). The report shall specify the number of electors whose registration has been canceled under Chapter 15 (relating to changes in records) and any other information required by the secretary.* * *§ 1501. Removal notices.* * *20250HB0785PN0806 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Use.--A registered elector who removes residence from one place to another within the same county must notify the commission by filing a removal notice under subsection (a) or a signed request for [renewal] removal that contains the information required in subsection (a) with the commission not later than the registration deadline before an election. If mailed, the notice or request must be postmarked not later than the deadline for registration or, in the case of an illegible or missing postmark, received within five days of the close of registration. The following apply:(1) An official registration application of an elector who has registered by mail or electronic voter registration application under section 1325.1 (relating to electronic voter registration) qualifies as a removal notice.* * *§ 1503. Change of enrollment of political party.By the deadline for registration, a registered elector who desires to change the enrollment of political designation or who, although registered, has not previously enrolled as a member of a party may appear before a commissioner, registrar or clerk or may submit an application by mail under section 1324 (relating to application by mail) [and state in a signed] or electronically under section 1325.1(f) (relating to electronic voter registration). In a case other than submission under section 1325.1(f), the registered elector shall state in a signed writing the political party in which the registered elector desires to be enrolled. If the signature of the elector is verified by comparison with the registered elector's signature as it appears on file with the commission, the commissioner, registrar or clerk shall make the change in its 20250HB0785PN0806 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registration records. [If] In a case other than submission under section 1325.1(f), if supported by other evidence of identity, a mark may be made in lieu of a signature by a registered elector who is unable to write. The mark must be made in the presence of a witness who must sign the registration application. For submissions under section 1325.1(f), the registered elector shall follow the procedure for verification of the registered elector's identity specified in section 1325.1 . § 1704. Altering registration.(a) Prohibition.--No registrar, commissioner, clerk or assistant [or], commission employee or other individual may do any of the following:(1) Intentionally insert or permit to be inserted an entry in a registration record without a proper application under this part or without requiring the proper evidence of the right of the applicant to be registered.(2) Intentionally materially alter a registration record after the entries have been made unless the alteration is in accordance with this part. This paragraph does not apply to an alteration pursuant to an order of a court of common pleas or of a commission.(3) Intentionally submit false information regarding a change of party enrollment or name or address on a registration record of another individual.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0785PN0806 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526